Idaho, session 2025, H0021.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 49-432, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-432. TEMPORARY REGISTRATION FOR RESIDENTS AND NONRESIDENTS --
FEES.
(1)(a) When a vehicle or combination of vehicles subject to registra-
tion is to be moved on the public highways in the state of Idaho, the
department may issue a permit in lieu of registration for any vehicle
or combination of vehicles upon the payment of a fee as set forth in the
following schedule:
(i) One-hundred-twenty (120) hour permit
Single vehicle ....................................$60.00
Combination of vehicles, where such combination of vehicles
includes more than one (1) unregistered vehicle.....$120.00
(ii) Fuel permit .......................................$60.00
(iii) Thirty (30) day unladen weight permit ..............$60.00
(b) If an annual registration is purchased within thirty (30) calen-
dar days of issuance of a permit under paragraph (a) (i) or (iii) of this
subsection, the amount of the permit fee shall be applied to the regis-
tration fee. No portion of a permit fee is subject to refund.
(2)(a) Permits to operate a vehicle or combination of vehicles in ex-
cess of the registered maximum gross vehicle weight up to a maximum of
one hundred twenty-nine thousand (129,000) pounds gross vehicle weight
shall be:
(i) One hundred twenty (120) hour permit to increase gross
weight.................................................$50.00
(ii) Thirty (30) day permit to increase gross vehicle weight:
Maximum Registered Temporary Permitted
Gross Weight of Vehicle Maximum Gross Weight
(Pounds) (Pounds)


80,000 86,000 96,000 106,000 116,000 129,000
50,001-60,000 $225 $250 $275 $300 $325 $350
(b) The permit issued pursuant to this subsection shall be specific to
the motor vehicle to which it is issued. No permit or fee shall be trans-
ferable or apportionable to any other vehicle, nor shall any such fee be
refundable. At the time of purchasing a permit, the applicant may pur-
chase additional permits in any combination that does not exceed a maxi-
mum of ninety (90) days.
(3) Permits issued pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section
shall be limited to three (3) per vehicle in a calendar year, except for those
permits provided for in subsection (1)(a)(ii) and (iii) of this section. The
provisions of this subsection with respect to limiting the number of permits
issued shall not apply to transporters and wreckers as defined in sections
49-121 and 49-124, Idaho Code, or to laden dealer and manufacturer plates as
provided for in sections 49-411(4) and 49-1627(5), Idaho Code.
(4) A temporary permit shall be readily available in a form required by
the rules of the board at all times while the vehicle is being operated.
(5) Any permit issued pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this sec-
tion shall be purchased prior to movement of the vehicle on a highway, and
such permit shall be in addition to and available only to a vehicle that is
currently and validly registered in Idaho pursuant to section 49-432(1)
subsection (1) of this section, 49-434(1), 49-434(8)(c) or 49-435, Idaho
Code.
(6) The department may select vendors to serve as agents on state high-
ways for the purpose of selling permits where fixed ports of entry do not ad-
equately serve a respective highway entering the state. The vendor shall
be remunerated at the rate of three dollars ($3.00) per permit sold, and he
shall collect the fees specified in this section and pay the fees to the de-
partment. The vendor shall guarantee payment by giving a bond to the state in
a sum as shall be fixed by the board, the premium on the bond to be paid by the
department.
SECTION 2. That Section 49-443B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-443B. LICENSE PLATES FOR STATE VEHICLES AND VEHICLES BELONGING TO
TAXING DISTRICTS. (1) License plates for state vehicles and vehicles belong-
ing to taxing districts shall be valid for a period of ten (10) years pursuant
to section 49-443(2), Idaho Code, and shall remain on the vehicle to which
it is issued until transferred to another vehicle or until it is canceled by
the department. The department shall be reimbursed by state agencies and the
taxing districts for the cost of providing license plates. The department
may develop rules to administer this license plate program.
(2) Each license plate issued pursuant to this section shall bear a des-
ignator to identify the agency, entity or office to which a vehicle belongs
or, for trailers or motorcycles, to specify the plate type. Any vehicle with
a license plate issued pursuant to this section that does not comply with the
provisions of this subsection as of the effective date of this act shall be
reregistered, subject to a reregistration fee of twelve dollars and fifty


cents ($12.50), within sixty (60) days of the effective date of this act. The
designators shall be as follows:
Designator Agency, entity, office, or plate type
A Trailer (all weights); small plate
C School district or miscellaneous city or county
agencies, entities or offices
D Highway district
F Fire district
G Fish and game
H Department of health and welfare
ISP Idaho state police
J Department of commerce or department of labor
L Law enforcement
M Motorcycle; small plate
P City police
R Department of parks and recreation
SO Sheriff's office
T Department of transportation
X Miscellaneous state agencies, entities or offices
Y Irrigation district
Z Department of lands
(3) Personalized or specialty license plates are exempt from the provi-
sions of subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.